Utah statutes.
7-1-1007.   Liability of financial institutions.

A financial institution is not liable to an account holder or person named or referenced within a record:

(1)  for a disclosure that is the result of a subpoena, order, or request made pursuant to Sections 7-1-1001 through 7-1-1006 if the financial institution reasonably believes that the subpoena, order, or request is properly made under Sections 7-1-1001 through 7-1-1006; or

(2)  for a disclosure or action taken in good faith pursuant to a data match or administrative subpoena provided for by a statute listed in Subsection 7-1-1006(3).



Amended by Chapter 381, 2009 General Session

